Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.090

Private grades or brands—Approval and registration.

The director may approve and register a private grade or brand for any fruit or vegetable. The private grade or brand shall not be lower than the second grade and/or classification established under the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter for the fruit or vegetable.

[ 1998 c 154 s 7; 1963 c 122 s 9.]